Washington statutes.
RCW 41.40.200

Retirement for disability in line of duty—Applicability to certain judges.

(1) Subject to the provisions of RCW 41.40.310 and 41.40.320, upon application of a member, or his or her employer, a member who becomes totally incapacitated for duty as the natural and proximate result of an accident occurring in the actual performance of duty or who becomes totally incapacitated for duty and qualifies to receive benefits under Title 51 RCW as a result of an occupational disease, as now or hereafter defined in RCW 51.08.140, while in the service of an employer, without willful negligence on his or her part, shall be retired subject to the following conditions:

(a) That the medical adviser, after a medical examination of such member made by or under the direction of the medical adviser, shall certify in writing that the member is mentally or physically totally incapacitated for the further performance of his or her duty and that such member should be retired;

(b) That the director concurs in the recommendation of the medical adviser;

(c) That no application shall be valid or a claim thereunder enforceable unless, in the case of an accident, the claim is filed within two years after the date upon which the injury occurred or, in the case of an occupational disease, the claim is filed within two years after the member separated from service with the employer; and

(d) That the coverage provided for occupational disease under this section may be restricted in the future by the legislature for all current and future members.

(2) The retirement for disability of a judge, who is a member of the retirement system, by the supreme court under Article IV, section 31 of the Constitution of the state of Washington (Amendment 71), with the concurrence of the director, shall be considered a retirement under subsection (1) of this section.

[ 1991 c 35 s 80; 1986 c 207 s 1; 1982 c 18 s 3; 1955 c 277 s 5; 1951 c 50 s 6; 1949 c 240 s 15; 1947 c 274 s 21; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 11072-21.]

NOTES:

Intent—1991 c 35: See note following RCW 41.26.005.